Montana, session 2025, HB436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Notice signs for traps and snares on public lands -- definitions. (1) A
trapper shall post a notice sign at a trailhead on public lands administered by the department where traps or
snares are located within 1,000 feet of the trailhead or within 100 feet of any point of a public trail marked by a
trailhead. If no trailhead exists, the sign must be posted at the point where a trapper accessed a public trail if
the traps or snares are located within 100 feet of the trail at any point.
(2) The department shall provide a downloadable, printable notice sign on its website or provide a
printed notice sign.
(3) The notice sign must:
(a) be no smaller than 8 1/2 x 11 inches in size;
(b) be able to withstand changing weather conditions;
(c) contain the current phone number of the department;
(d) contain the following title with letters that are at least 1 inch in height: "Notice: Traps or snares
are set in this area."
(e) contain the following statement beneath the title: "It is unlawful to destroy, disturb, or remove a
trap or snare belonging to another person or to remove wildlife from a trap or snare without permission of the
owner of the trap or snare. Exception: From March 1 to October 1 a livestock owner may remove a trap or
snare that could endanger livestock. If you disturb a trap or snare, please contact Fish, Wildlife, and Parks."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 436

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 436.1

(4) If the notice sign is illegible or missing, it is the responsibility of the trapper to replace the sign
within 24 hours of noticing the need for a new sign or of being informed by another party that the sign is illegible
or missing.
(5) The trapper shall remove signs only after the trapper's traps and snares are removed.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) (i) "Public trail" means any trail designated, maintained, mapped, and marked by a state or
federal land management agency on the most current official map of the agency.
(ii) The term does not include public roadways and waterways or water trails designated for
floating craft.
(b) "Trailhead" means the area beginning at the sign marking the origin of a public trail or segment
of trail that is designated, maintained, mapped, and marked by at least one visible sign posted by the
responsible state or federal land management agency and identified on the most current official map of the
agency. The term includes any adjacent improved graveled or paved vehicle parking lot.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 6, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 436